Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,224
Court-ordered inspection.

(MBCA 16.04) (a) If a corporation
does not allow a shareholder who complies with subsection (a) of section 21-2,222
to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available
for inspection, the district court of the county where the corporation's principal
office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located may summarily
order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation's
expense upon application of the shareholder.

(b) If a corporation does
not within a reasonable time allow a shareholder to inspect and copy any other
record, the shareholder who complies with subsections (c) and (d) of section
21-2,222 may apply to the district court of the county where the corporation's
principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located
for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The
court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited
basis.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 224.
January 1, 2017